pt-BR: Raio de cobertura: Caribenho; América Central; Ásia Central; Ásia Oriental; Europa; Oriente Médio; Norte da África; América do Norte; Oceania; América do Sul; Ásia Meridional; África Subsaariana; Outro
pl: Zasięg radiowy: karaibska; Ameryka Środkowa; Azja Centralna; Azja Południowo-Wschodnia; Europa; Bliski Wschód; Afryka Północna; Ameryka Północna; Oceania; Ameryka Południowa; Azja Południowa; Afryka Subsaharyjska; Inne
ru: Регион покрытия: Карибы; Центральная Америка; Центральная Азия; Восточная Азия; Европа; Ближний Восток; Северная Африка; Северная Америка; Океания; Южная Америка; Южная Азия; Африка к югу от Сахары; Другое
en: Coverage region: Caribbean; Central America; Central Asia; East Asia; Europe; Middle East; North Africa; North America; Oceania; South America; South Asia; Sub-Saharan Africa; Other
ko: 도달 지역: 카리브; 중앙 아메리카; 중앙 아시아; 동아시아; 유럽; 중동; 북아프리카; 북아메리카; 오세아니아; 남아메리카; 남아시아; 사하라 이남 아프리카; 기타
cs: Oblast pokrytí: Karibská; Střední Amerika; Střední Asie; Východní Asie; Evropa; Střední východ; Severní Afrika; Severní Amerika; Oceánie; Jižní Amerika; Jížní Asie; Subsaharská Afrika; Jiné
zh-CN: 覆盖区域: 加勒比海; 中美洲; 中亚; 东亚; 欧洲; 中东; 北非; 北美; 大洋洲; 南美; 南亚; 撒哈拉以南非洲; 其他
sl-SI: Regija pokritosti: Karibi; Srednja Amerika; Srednja Azija; Vzhodna Azija; Evropa; Bližnji vzhod; Severna Afrika; Severna Amerika; Oceanija; Južna Amerika; Južna Azija; Podsaharska Afrika; Drugo
th: ภูมิภาคที่ครอบคลุม: แคริบเบียน; อเมริกากลาง; เอเชียกลาง; เอเชียตะวันออก; ยุโรป; ตะวันออกกลาง; แอฟริกาเหนือ; อเมริกาเหนือ; โอเชียเนีย; อเมริกาใต้; เอเชียใต้; แอฟริกาตอนใต้ทะเลทรายซาฮารา; อื่นๆ
ja: 対象地域: カリブ料理; 中米; 中央アジア; 東アジア; ヨーロッパ; 中東; 北アフリカ; 北米; オセアニア; 南米; 南アジア; サブサハラアフリカ; その他
nl: Dekkingsregio: Caribisch; Centraal-Amerika; Centraal-Azië; Oost-Azië; Europa; Midden-Oosten; Noord-Afrika; Noord-Amerika; Oceanië; South America; Zuid-Azië; Sub-Sahara-Afrika; Andere
pt-PT: Região de cobertura: Caribe; América Central; Ásia Central; Leste Asiático; Europa; Médio Oriente; Norte de África; América do Norte; Oceânia; América do Sul; Ásia do Sul; África subsariana; Outro
fr: Région de couverture: Antillais; Amérique centrale; Asie centrale; Asie de l’Est; Europe; Moyen-Orient; Afrique du Nord; Amérique du Nord; Océanie; Amérique du Sud; Asie du sud; Afrique sub-saharienne; Autre
tr: Kapsama bölgesi: Karayipler; Orta Amerika; Orta Asya; Doğu Asya; Avrupa; Orta Doğu; Kuzey Afrika; Kuzey Amerika; Okyanusya; Güney Amerika; Güney Asya; Sahra Altı Afrika; Diğer
el: Μεγάλη περιοχή κάλυψης: Καραϊβική; Κεντρική Αμερική; Κεντρική Ασία; Ανατολική Ασία; Ευρώπη; Μέση Ανατολή; Βόρεια Αφρική; Βόρεια Αμερική; Ωκεανία; Νότια Αμερική; Νότια Ασία; Υποσαχάρια Αφρική; Άλλο
nb: Dekningsområde: Karibisk; Sentral-Amerika; Sentral-Asia; Øst-Asia; Europa; Midtøsten; Nord-Afrika; Nord-Amerika; Oseania; Sør-Amerika; Sør-Asia; Subsaharisk Afrika; Annet
da: Dækningsregion: Caribisk; Mellemamerika; Centralasien; Østasien; Europa; Mellemøsten; Nordafrika; Nordamerika; Oceanien; Sydamerika; Sydasien; Afrika syd for Sahara; Andet
hu: Lefedettségi régió: Karib-térség; Közép-Amerika; Közép-Ázsia; Kelet-Ázsia; Európa; Közel-Kelet; Dél-Afrika; Észak-Amerika; Óceánia; Dél-Amerika; Dél-Ázsia; Szubszaharai Afrika; Egyéb
fi: Kattavuusalue: Karibialainen; Keski-Amerikka; Keski-Aasia; Itä-Aasia; Eurooppa; Lähi-itä; Pohjois-Afrikka; Pohjois-Amerikka; Oseania; Etelä-Amerikka; Etelä-Aasia; Saharan eteläpuolinen Afrikka; Muu
sv: Täckningsregion: Karibiskt; Centralamerika; Centralasien; Östasien; Europa; Mellanöstern; Nordafrika; Nordamerika; Oceanien; Sydamerika; Sydasien; Subsahariska Afrika; Övrigt
ro-RO: Regiune de acoperire: Caraibe; America Centrală; Asia Centrală; Asia de Est; Europa; Orientul Mijlociu; Africa de Nord; America de Nord; Oceania; America de Sud; Asia de Sud; Africa Subsahariană; Altele
it: Area geografica della copertura: Caraibico; America Centrale; Asia centrale; Sud-est asiatico; Europa; Medio Oriente; Nord Africa; Nord America; Oceania; Sud America; Asia del sud; Africa sub-sahariana; Altro
bg-BG: Регион на покритие: Карибите; Централна Америка; Централна Азия; Източна Азия; Европа; Близкия изток; Северна Африка; Северна Америка; Океания; Южна Америка; Южна Азия; Субсахарска Африка; Други
es: Región de cobertura: Caribeño; Centroamérica; Asia Central; Asia del Este; Europa; Oriente Medio; Norte de África; América del norte; Oceanía; América del sur; Asia del Sur; Africa Sub-sahariana; Otros
hr-HR: Regija pokrivenosti: Karibi; Srednja Amerika; Srednja Azija; Istočna Azija; Europa; Bliski istok; Sjeverna Afrika; Sjeverna Amerika; Oceanija; Južna Amerika; Južna Azija; Subsaharska Afrika; Ostalo
zh-TW: 覆蓋範圍地區: 加勒比海; 中美洲; 中亞; 東亞; 歐洲; 中東; 北非; 北美洲; 大洋洲; 南美洲; 南亞; 撒哈拉以南非洲; 其他
sk-SK: Oblasť pokrytia: Karibik; Stredná Amerika; Stredná Ázia; Východná Ázia; Európa; Stredný východ; Severná Afrika; Severná Amerika; Oceánia; Južná Amerika; Južná Ázia; Subsaharská Afrika; Iné
de: Abdeckungsregion: Karibisch; Zentralamerika; Zentralasien; Ostasien; Europa; Naher Osten; Nordafrika; Nordamerika; Ozeanien; Südamerika; Südasien; Subsahara-Afrika; Sonstiges
vi: Vùng phủ sóng: Kiểu Caribe; Trung Mỹ; Trung Á; Đông Á; Châu Âu; Trung Đông; Bắc Phi; Bắc Mỹ; Châu Đại Dương; Nam Mỹ; Nam Á; Châu Phi cận Sahara; Khác
lt-LT: Aprėpties regionas: Karibai; Centrinė Amerika; Vidurinė Azija; Rytų Azija; Europa; Artimieji Rytai; Šiaurės Afrika; Šiaurės Amerika; Okeanija; Pietų Amerika; Pietų Azija; Užsachario Afrika; Kita